Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. State Game Refuges.
Sec. 16.20.036.
Susitna Flats State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land, including tide and submerged land, and all land, including tide and submerged land, acquired in the future by the state lying within the parcels described in this subsection is established as the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge:

Township 13 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 14 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 14 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 14 North, Ranges 6 — 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 14 North, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 6 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 7 West, Seward Meridian

The Susitna Flats State Game Refuge is established to protect the following:

fish and wildlife habitat and populations, particularly waterfowl nesting, feeding, and migration areas; moose calving areas; spring and fall bear feeding areas; salmon spawning and rearing habitats;

public uses of fish and wildlife and their habitat, particularly waterfowl, moose, and bear hunting; viewing; photography; and general public recreation in a high quality environment.

Entry upon the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge for purposes of exploration and development of oil and gas resources shall be permitted when compatible with the purposes specified in (b) of this section; however, all existing leases shall be valid and continue in full force and effect according to their terms.

Land selected by the Matanuska-Susitna Borough within the area described in (a) of this section shall be included in the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge, subject to borough approval. If the borough relinquishes the selection of the land, the selected land becomes part of the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within state-owned land specified in (a) of this section for inclusion in the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge. The Department of Natural Resources may adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), zoning regulations governing privately owned land within the Susitna Flats State Game Refuge, only to the extent that these regulations may insure compatibility with the intended use of the refuge.

Egress and ingress to and from private property within the parcels described in (a) of this section shall be allowed through access corridors established through agreement between the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Fish and Game, and the private property owners involved. The establishment of a refuge under this section does not impair or alter existing rights of access to set net site leases.

The establishment of a refuge under this section does not impair or alter existing rights of a municipality to state land selected under former AS 29.18.190 — 29.18.200.

Section: 6;

Sections: 1 — 10;

Sections: 1 — 18;

Sections: 1 — 18;

Sections: 1 — 24;

Sections: 1 — 36;

Sections: 13, 23
—
26, 36 (excluding uplands above the toe of the bluff);

Sections: Lots 1
—
6, SE1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4, SE1/4 SE1/4, W1/2 SW1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4 of Section 31;

Sections: W1/2 1, 2
—
11, W1/2 12, 13
—
36;

Sections: All;

Sections: 12
—
14, 22
—
27, 34
—
36;

Sections: 3
—
10, 15
—
22, SW1/4 26, 27
—
35, SW1/4 36;

Sections: All;

Sections: 1
—
4, E1/2 5, 7
—
36;

Sections: 1, 2, 8
—
36;

Sections: 23
—
28, 32
—
36;

Sections: 19
—
22, 27
—
34;

Sections: 21
—
28, 31
—
36;

Sections: 22
—
27, 34
—
36.

History.

(§ 1 ch 140 SLA 1976; am § 28 ch 132 SLA 1984; am § 41 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Sec. 16.20.037.
Minto Flats State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land and water is established as the Minto Flats State Game Refuge:

Township 1 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 North, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 North, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 4 North, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 North, Range 5 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 North, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 5 North, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 1 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 6 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 9 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 10 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 2 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 7 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 8 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 11 West, Fairbanks Meridian

Township 3 South, Range 12 West, Fairbanks Meridian

The Minto Flats State Game Refuge is established to

ensure the protection and enhancement of habitat;

ensure the conservation of fish and wildlife; and

guarantee the continuation of hunting, fishing, trapping, and other uses by the public compatible with the protection and enhancement of habitat and the conservation of fish and wildlife.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within the Minto Flats State Game Refuge, but may acquire privately owned land by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Minto Flats State Game Refuge.

Management decisions under this section made by the commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of fish and game are applicable only to land and water described in (a) of this section.

Public access to the Minto Flats State Game Refuge by means of horse, boat, aircraft, dog team, snow machine, ATV, or other means consistent with (b) of this section may not be prohibited.

Access to and from private property within the Minto Flats State Game Refuge shall be guaranteed through access corridors established through agreement between the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Fish and Game, and the private property owners involved.

The Department of Fish and Game and the Department of Natural Resources shall exercise their respective authorities over the Minto Flats State Game Refuge consistent with a management plan prepared by the Department of Fish and Game in consultation with the Department of Natural Resources.

Entry upon the Minto Flats State Game Refuge for purposes of exploration and development of oil and gas resources shall be permitted unless a person demonstrates, on the basis of sound science or local traditional knowledge, that exploration and development is incompatible with the purposes specified in (b) of this section.

Sections 2 — 11

Sections 14 — 23

Sections 26 — 34;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 1 — 16

Sections 21 — 28: excluding ASLS 95-37

Section 35: E1/2

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 12;

Sections 1 — 12;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 8 — 17

Section 18: east of Tolovana River

Section 19: east of Tolovana River

Sections 20 — 29

Section 30: east of Tolovana River;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 1 — 36;

Section 3

Section 7: S1/2

Sections 8 — 10

Section 11: S1/2N1/2, S1/2

Section 12: S1/2N1/2, S1/2

Sections 13 — 36;

Section 10: S1/2

Section 11: S1/2

Section 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 15

Sections 22 — 27

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 6 — 8

Section 9: S1/2S1/2

Sections 13 — 36;

Section 1

Sections 5 — 10

Sections 14 — 23

Sections 25 — 36;

Section 24: S1/2

Section 25

Sections 33 — 36;

Sections 34 — 35;

Sections 2 — 9

Sections 16 — 21;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 5: S1/2

Section 6: S1/2

Sections 7 — 24

Sections 27 — 29

Sections 30 — 31

Section 32: N1/2, SW1/4;

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 27

Sections 30 — 31

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 6: W1/2

Section 7: W1/2

Section 18: W1/2;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: SE1/4

Section 9: E1/2

Sections 10 — 15

Section 16: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 20: S1/2

Sections 21 — 29

Sections 31 — 36;

Section 35: SE1/4

Section 36: S1/2;

Sections 5 — 8

Sections 17 — 20

Sections 29 — 31;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1 — 36;

Sections 7 — 36;

Sections 25 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 6: S1/2NW1/4, S1/2

Section 7: all North and West of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

Section 18: all North and West of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

Section 19: all North and West of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way;

Sections 1 — 12

Section 13: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, S1/2SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 14: W1/2

Sections 15 — 22

Section 23: W1/2

Section 24: all North and West of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

Section 27: NW1/4

Sections 28 — 32

Section 33: NE1/4NE1/4, W1/2NE1/4, W1/2, W1/2SE1/4;

Section 1

Sections 12 — 13

Sections 24 — 25

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 12

Section 17: W1/2NW1/4, NW1/4SW1/4

Section 18

Section 19: N1/2, N1/2S1/2;

Sections 1 — 20

Section 21: NE1/4, W1/2

Section 22: NW1/4

Section 24: N1/2, N1/2S1/2

Sections 29 — 31;

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 7 — 36;

Sections 25 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 5: N1/2NE1/4, W1/2

Sections 6 — 7

Section 18: NE1/4, W1/2, N1/2SE1/4, SW1/4SE1/4;

Section 1

Section 12

Section 13

Section 22: NE1/4 (that portion above the ordinary high water mark right bank Tanana River)

Section 23: N1/2, SE1/4

Section 24: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 25: NW1/4;

Sections 2 — 10

Section 11: N1/2

Section 14: SW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4, SW1/4, W1/2SE1/4

Sections 15 — 21

Section 22: NE1/4, W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Section 23: NW1/4

Section 27: W1/2NE1/4, NW1/4, W1/2SW1/4

Sections 28 — 31

Section 32: NE1/4, NW1/4, SE1/4

Section 33: W1/2;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and terms and conditions applicable to the conveyance of the land at the historic Old Minto site authorized by the 2004 amendment of paragraph (3) of this section, see §§ 1 and 3, ch. 168, SLA 2004, in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent on ch. 18, SLA 1988 (CSSB 55 (Res) am H), see 1988 House Journal 2087.

Sec. 16.20.038.
Trading Bay State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land, including tide and submerged land, and all land, including tide and submerged land, acquired in the future by the state lying within the parcels described in this subsection is established as the Trading Bay State Game Refuge:

Township 9 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 North, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 14 — 15 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 14 West, Seward Meridian

The Trading Bay State Game Refuge is established to protect the following:

fish and wildlife habitat and populations, particularly waterfowl nesting, feeding and migration areas; moose calving areas; spring and fall bear feeding areas; salmon spawning and rearing habitats;

public uses of fish and wildlife and their habitat, particularly waterfowl, moose and bear hunting; viewing; photography; and general public recreation in a high quality environment.

Entry upon the Trading Bay State Game Refuge for purposes of exploration and development of oil and gas resources shall be permitted when compatible with the purposes specified in (b) of this section; however, all existing leases shall be valid and continue in full force and effect according to their terms.

Land selected by a borough within the area described in (a) of this section shall be included in the Trading Bay State Game Refuge, subject to borough approval. If the borough relinquishes the selection of the land, the selected land becomes part of the Trading Bay State Game Refuge.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within state-owned land specified in (a) of this section for inclusion in the Trading Bay State Game Refuge. The Department of Natural Resources may adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), zoning regulations governing privately owned land within the Trading Bay State Game Refuge, only to the extent that these regulations are imperative to insure compatibility with the intended use of the refuge.

Egress and ingress to and from private property within the parcels described in (a) of this section shall be allowed through access corridors established through agreement between the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of Fish and Game, and the private property owners involved. The establishment of a refuge under this section does not impair or alter existing rights of access to set net site leases.

The establishment of a refuge under this section does not impair or alter existing rights of a municipality to state land selected under former AS 29.18.190 — 29.18.200.

Land within existing and applied for highway, pipeline, and railway rights-of-way, as of September 22, 1976, are excluded from the land described in (a) of this section; however, when these interests revert to the state, the land shall be included within the Trading Bay State Game Refuge.

The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt regulations governing the issuance of permits for seasonal cabins or shelters within the refuge. The department shall issue a permit to owners of cabins or shelters existing on June 24, 1976. Use permits shall be for a period not to exceed five years and shall be renewable.

Any land conveyed to Cook Inlet Region, Inc. by the state under the terms of the Cook Inlet land exchange is excluded from the refuge.

Sections 6
—
7;

Sections 1
—
4, E 1/2 5, 8
—
12, W 1/2 13, 14
— 17, E 1/2 19, 20
—
22, W 1/2 23, W 1/2 27, 28
—
30;

Sections W 1/2 1, 2
—
4, 9
—
11, W 1/2 12 and 13, 14
— 16, 19
— 23,
W 1/2 24, 26
—
28, 31
—
35;

Sections 1
—
12, 14
—
22, 28
—
32;

Sections 1
—
18, E 1/2 19, 20
—
29, 32
—
36;

Sections 1
—
12, 14
—
23, 26
—
35;

Sections SW 1/4 3, 4
—
10, SW 1/4 11, W 1/2SW 1/4 13, 14 — 23, W 1/2, SE 1/4, W 1/2 NE 1/4, SE 1/4 NE 1/4 24, 25
— 36;

Sections 1
—
36;

Sections 19, 29
—
33;

Sections 23
—
26, 31
—
33, 36.

History.

(§ 1 ch 255 SLA 1976; am § 42 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Sec. 16.20.039.
Creamer’s Field Migratory Waterfowl Refuge.

The following state-owned land and water is established as the Creamer’s Field Migratory Waterfowl Refuge:

commencing at the Section Corner on the Fairbanks Base Line common to Sections 33 and 34, Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian, Point of Beginning, thence East along the Fairbanks Base Line 4703.30 feet, thence South 0 degrees 00 minutes 16 seconds West 235.67 feet to the south bank of a tributary of Isabella Creek, thence along the south bank of the tributary to Isabella Creek North 70 degrees 59 minutes 51 seconds West 525.44 feet, continuing North 88 degrees 22 minutes 22 seconds West 85.48 feet to the confluence with the south bank of Isabella Creek, thence along the south bank of Isabella Creek South 85 degrees 27 minutes 47 seconds West 209.43 feet, continuing South 68 degrees 10 minutes 59 seconds West 220.04 feet, continuing South 65 degrees 19 minutes 35 seconds West 434.66 feet to the northwestern boundary to Tract No. 5 of instrument number 60-4556 (Plat, recorded June 21, 1960) in the Fairbanks Recorder’s Office, thence South 53 degrees 52 minutes 05 seconds West 1228.34 feet along the westerly boundary of the Subdivision of Tract No. 5 from the Charles Creamer Property, thence South 35 degrees 00 minutes 05 seconds West 300.08 feet to the northerly boundary of Lemeta Subdivision, thence along the north boundary of the Lemeta Subdivision North 89 degrees 52 minutes 58 seconds West 646.40 feet to the northern College Road right-of-way, thence along the north edge of the College Road right-of-way North 71 degrees 53 minutes 31 seconds West 688.05 feet, thence North 18 degrees 21 minutes 30 seconds East 12 feet, continuing on a 2 degree 17 minute 26 second curve to the right 415.49 feet, continuing North 62 degrees 07 minutes 30 seconds West 275.16 feet, thence North 27 degrees 52 minutes 30 seconds East 10.00 feet, continuing on a 2 degree 26 minute 29 second curve to the left 473.08 feet, thence leaving the College Road right-of-way North 0 degrees 03 minutes East 611.23 feet to the Fairbanks Base Line, thence North 89 degrees 56 minutes 34 seconds East along the Fairbanks Base Line 200.03 feet to the Section Corner common to Sections 33 and 34 on the Fairbanks Base Line and the Point of Beginning, containing 83.7 acres, more or less;

the W1/2SW1/4 and the SE1/4SW1/4 of Section 27; the S1/2 of Section 28; the portions of the S1/2SE1/4 lying southerly of the Farmers Loop Road right-of-way and the SE1/4SE1/4NE1/4SE1/4 of Section 29; all of Section 34; and the W1/2 and the W1/2E1/2 of Section 35, all in Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian;

Tract B-2 and Tract C of Alaska State Land Survey No. 83-62 in Section 33, Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian, according to Plat No. 83-272 as filed in the Fairbanks Recording District on December 20, 1983, and as modified by the public utility easement vacation plat filed in the Fairbanks Recording District on February 22, 1985, as Plat No. 85-27;

the SW1/4SW1/4 of Section 26 in Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian (also known as a portion of Tax Lot 2600);

the SE1/4 of Section 27 in Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian excepting therefrom:

all that portion lying within Air Park Subdivision according to the plat filed November 20, 1978, as Plat No. 78-206 Fairbanks Recording District; Replat Lot 7 Block 1 Air Park Subdivision and Air Park Subdivision First Addition according to the plat filed April 2, 1979, as Plat No. 79-56 Fairbanks Recording District; Air Park Second Addition, according to the plat filed November 26, 1979, as Plat No. 79-264 and amended plat filed May 15, 1980, as Plat No. 80-86 Fairbanks Recording District; Air Park Subdivision Third Addition according to the plat filed June 14, 1993, as Plat No. 93-160 Fairbanks Recording District; and

the West 240 feet as conveyed to Sherman Field Airstrip Owner’s Association, Inc., by Bargain and Sale Deed recorded January 19, 1989, in Book 606, Page 586, Fairbanks Recording District;

the portions of the E1/2SW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, W1/2SE1/4SE1/4NW1/4, E1/2NW1/4SE1/4NW1/4, and W1/2NE1/4SE1/4NW1/4 lying southerly of Farmers Loop Road right-of-way, according to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities Project RS-0644(13)/60384, as Plat No. 2008-89, Fairbanks Recording District, all lying within Section 28 in Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian;

the E1/2SW1/4 and the NW1/4SW1/4 within Section 26 in Township 1 North, Range 1 West, Fairbanks Meridian.

The land and water described in (a)(1) of this section is subject to an easement for water and sewer lines given to the City of Fairbanks, along a portion of the southern boundary of the tract, more particularly described as follows: commencing at the Section Corner on the Fairbanks Base Line common to Sections 33 and 34, T1N R1W Fairbanks Meridian, thence N89° 55´ W 200.01´, thence S0° 03´ W 611.23´, thence easterly on a 2° 26´ 29´´ curve to the right a distance of approximately 201´ to the intersection with the section line common to Sections 3 and 4 T1S R1W Fairbanks Meridian, and the start of the easement, the easement being 20´ wide entirely to the left of the line being now described: continue easterly on a 2° 26´ 29´´ curve to the right 272´, thence S27° 52´ 30´´W 10´, thence S62° 07´ 30´´E 275.16´, thence on a 2° 17´ 26´´ curve to the left 402.96´, thence N11° 01´E 75.62´, thence S71° 38´ 30´´E 965.11´, thence S89° 52´ 58´´ E approximately 378.00´ to the end of the easement, being a point of the boundary of the land and water described in (a)(1) of this section.

The Creamer’s Field Migratory Waterfowl Refuge is established to provide the following:

protection and enhancement of habitat for migratory birds with special emphasis on waterfowl;

opportunity to view, photograph, and study various species of plants, wildlife and geological features typical to interior Alaska.

The department shall develop a management plan for the land described in (a) of this section to promote the purposes described in (c) of this section. Recreational and agricultural activity is expressly permitted within the land described in (a) of this section if consistent with the management plan adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 1979; am §§ 1, 2 ch 7 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

Sec. 16.20.040.
[Renumbered as AS 16.20.075.]

Sec. 16.20.041.
McNeil River State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land and water, including the tideland but exclusive of marine water and submerged land, lying within the parcels described in this subsection is established as the McNeil River State Game Refuge:

The McNeil River State Game Refuge is established to

provide permanent protection for brown bear and other fish and wildlife populations and their habitats, so that these resources may be preserved for scientific, aesthetic, and educational purposes;

manage human use and activities in a way that is compatible with (1) of this subsection and to maintain and enhance the unique bear viewing opportunities in the McNeil River State Game Sanctuary established under AS

16.20.160

;

provide opportunities that are compatible with (1) of this subsection for wildlife viewing, fisheries enhancement, fishing, hunting, and trapping, for temporary safe anchorage, and for other activities.

The Board of Game shall determine whether hunting of brown bears within the McNeil River State Game Refuge should be prohibited.

The use and enjoyment of valid rights and interests in mineral claims, including the right of access, within the McNeil River State Game Refuge is protected. This subsection does not affect the power of the commissioner of natural resources to open or close land within the McNeil River State Game Refuge to new mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

The department and the Department of Natural Resources

may not enter into sales of land within the McNeil River State Game Refuge;

may enter into leases within the McNeil River State Game Refuge if the commissioner finds that activity conducted under the lease is compatible with the purposes for which the refuge is established;

may not accept transfer of state selected land from the federal government, or conveyance of other land, within the refuge if the land is subject to

a lease, easement, or other right to operate or maintain a private facility on the land or to conduct a private enterprise on the land; or

a continuing trespass by an unauthorized private facility or private enterprise.

The commissioner shall prepare a report and notify the legislature of its availability by January 30 of each year on

the status of the brown bears and other fish and wildlife resources within the McNeil River State Game Refuge; and

the effect of hunting, fishing, and trapping, fishery enhancement activity, and mineral resource development on these resources.

Township 10 South, Range 29 West, Seward Meridian

Section 19: S1/2

Section 20: SW1/4

Section 29: W1/2

Sections 30 — 31

Township 10 South, Range 30 West, Seward Meridian

Section 3: SW1/4

Section 4: SE1/4

Sections 10 — 11

Sections 14 — 16

Section 17: E1/2

Sections 20 — 23

Sections 25 — 29

Section 30: SE1/4

Section 31: NE1/4, S1/2

Sections 32 — 36

Township 11 South, Range 29 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 35

Section 36, except Nordyke Island and its tideland

Township 11 South, Range 30 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 36

Township 11 South, Range 31 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 36

Township 11 South, Range 32 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 36, except land within Katmai National Park and Preserve

Township 12 South, Range 31 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 36

Township 12 South, Range 32 West, Seward Meridian

Sections 1 — 36, except land within Katmai National Park and Preserve

Township 13 South, Range 33 West, Seward Meridian

Section 1, except land within Katmai National Park and Preserve.

History.

(§ 2 ch 56 SLA 1991; am § 21 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1999)

Delayed repeal. —

Under §§ 7 and 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991, this section is repealed upon entry of a final order permanently enjoining the operation of the Paint River fish ladder and the expiration of any time for appeal of the order. The commissioner of fish and game shall certify to the revisor of statutes the date determined under § 9,
ch. 56, SLA 1991. As of May 2022, the required certification had not occurred.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 56, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 8, ch. 56, SLA 1991, the enactment of this section by § 2, ch. 56, SLA 1991 was to become effective on the date the Paint River fish ladder began operation. The commissioner of fish and game certified that the fish ladder began operation on January 1, 1993. Consequently, this section became effective on that date.

Sec. 16.20.050.
Multiple land use.

Where the use, lease, or disposal of real property in state game refuges created by AS

16.20.010

—

16.20.080

is under the control or jurisdiction of the state, whether through federal permit or state ownership, the responsible state department or agency shall notify the commissioner of fish and game before initiating any use, lease, or disposal of real property.
The commissioner shall acknowledge receipt of notice by return mail.

History.

(§ 5 ch 114 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

For personal use cabin permits, see 11 AAC 65.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The language of this section, AS

16.20.060

, and other sections precludes an interpretation which would grant Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority over transactions which are not likely to affect fish or game or their habitat. 1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 16.20.060.
Submission of plans and specifications.

If the commissioner so determines, the commissioner shall, in the letter of acknowledgment required under AS

16.20.050

, require the person or governmental agency to submit full plans for the anticipated use, full plans and specifications of proposed construction work, complete plans and specifications for the proper protection of fish and game, and the approximate date when the construction or work is to commence, and shall require the person or governmental agency to obtain the written approval of the commissioner as to the sufficiency of the plans or specifications before construction is commenced.
The commissioner shall abide by the principle that recognizes preferences among beneficial uses as more particularly set forth in art. VIII of the state constitution.

History.

(§ 5 ch 114 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, the phrase “required under AS

16.20.050

” was added to the first sentence of this section to conform to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Administrative Code. —

For special areas, see 5 AAC 95, art. 4.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

For permit procedures, see 5 AAC 95, art. 7.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Fish and Game has permit jurisdiction over activities affecting anadromous streams, over activities in streams “frequented by fish” if those latter activities will result in the physical obstruction of that stream, and over all land use activities within the state refuge system.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Within the scope of the permit jurisdiction of the Department of Fish and Game and Boards of Fisheries and Game, the department and the boards have the authority to adopt regulations establishing standards and procedures for the processing of those permits. March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

No one entity has explicit permit jurisdiction over all of the areas covered by the Habitat Protection Regulations (5 AAC 95).
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The language of AS

16.20.050

, this section, and other sections precludes an interpretation which would grant Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority over transactions which are not likely to affect fish or game or their habitat. 1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

The most logical interpretation of statutory provisions gives the Alaska Department of Fish and Game permit authority in special areas over any activity which the department determines may affect fish or game or their habitat; that interpretation is consistent with the language of the statutes and the general rule articulated by the Alaska Supreme Court, in

Kenai Peninsula Fisherman’s Coop. Ass’n v. State

, Sup. Ct. Op. No. 2358 (File No. 5072), 628 P.2d 897 (1981), that “conservation laws such as fish and game laws should be liberally construed to achieve their intended purpose.”
1985 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 4.

Sec. 16.20.070.
Relationship to other laws.

AS

16.20.050

and

16.20.060

do not affect AS

16.05.871

—

16.05.891

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 114 SLA 1960; am E.O. No 107, § 4 (2003); am E.O. No. 114 § 6 (2008); am § 13 ch 8 SLA 2011)

Sec. 16.20.075.
Regulations.

The board shall, under AS 16.05, adopt regulations governing the taking of game on state game refuges it considers advisable for conservation and protection purposes.

History.

(§ 4 ch 114 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.20.040

. Renumbered in 1992.

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

Sec. 16.20.080.
Definitions.

In AS

16.20.010

—

16.20.080

,

“board” means the Board of Game;

“game” means any species of bird and mammal, including a feral mammal, but excluding domestic birds and mammals.

History.

(§ 2 ch 114 SLA 1960; am § 25 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.